Maine, session 132, LD1197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §6100-OO, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 662, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §6100-OO, sub-§14, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 662, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §6100-UU, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 662, §2, is repealed.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.